Indiana, session 2026, HB1015.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-16-7-26 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) This section does not apply to the following:
(1) An Indiana National Guard unit that has been federalized
under 10 U.S.C. 12301 or other applicable federal law.
(2) A member of the Indiana National Guard called to state
active duty in accordance with an emergency declared by the
governor under IC 10-14-3-12 for:
(A) a natural disaster;
(B) a riot; or
(C) an act of terrorism.
(b) This section may not be suspended under IC 10-14-3 or any
other law.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a governor may not order a
member of the Indiana National Guard to perform any law
enforcement duty that may result in the surveillance,
apprehension, detention, or arrest of an individual.
2026 IN 1015—LS 6266/DI 116